District of Columbia statutes.
16-831.03

Action for custody of a child by a de facto parent.

(a)

A de facto parent may file a complaint for custody of a child or a motion to intervene in any existing action involving custody of the child.

(b)

An individual who establishes that he or she is a de facto parent by clear and convincing evidence shall be deemed a parent for the purposes of §§ 16-911, 16-914, 16-914.01, and 16-916, and for the purposes of this chapter if a third party is seeking custody of the child of the de facto parent.

(c)

(1)

All proceedings involving a parent and a de facto parent, including an action for child support, shall be governed by §§ 16-911, 16-914, 16-914.01, and 16-916.

(2)

A custody proceeding involving a third party and a de facto parent shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter.

Sept. 20, 2007, D.C. Law 17-21, § 2(b), 54 DCR 6835
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 217(d), 56 DCR 1117

History

D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section designation.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Safe and Stable Homes for Children and Youth Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-69, July 9, 2007, 54 DCR 6826).

Emergency Legislation